North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-26.1 Physical Therapists
43-26.1-16.
Representations and billings without licensure prohibited — Enforcement — Injunctions.

No person or business entities of any type shall practice physical therapy or hold themselves out, represent themselves, or send out billings as providing physical therapy services, without personal licensure or the use of licensed employees as provided in this chapter. It shall be unlawful to employ an unlicensed physical therapist or physical therapist assistant to provide physical therapy services. The board’s executive officer, under the board’s direction, shall aid state’s attorneys in the enforcement of this chapter and the prosecution of any violations thereof. In addition to the criminal penalties provided by this chapter, the civil remedy of injunction shall be available to restrain and enjoin violations of this chapter without proof of actual damages sustained by any person.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 365, § 2.

43-26.1-17.
Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 365, § 2.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.